Wyoming, session 2025, HB0175.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Wyoming veterans' memorial museum" means
the property described in W.S. 19-14-110;

HB0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0190
(ii) "Wyoming veterans' memorial museum
renovation project" means all preconstruction and
construction activities necessary to renovate the Wyoming
veterans' memorial museum, including design, planning,
contracting for, construction and renovation.

(b) The Wyoming veterans' memorial museum renovation
project is authorized. The governor and Wyoming military
department, through the state construction department, may
enter into contracts and retain experts as necessary to
complete the Wyoming veterans' memorial museum renovation
project. The department shall keep the Wyoming veterans'
memorial museum task force informed of all contracting
activities. No contract shall be executed without the
approval of the governor.

Section 2.

(a) There is created the Wyoming veterans' memorial
museum renovation task force to consist of the following:

(i) Members of the legislature as follows:

HB0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0190
(A) Two (2) members of the Wyoming house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house, who
serve on the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and
cultural resources interim committee. The speaker of the
house shall designate one (1) of the members appointed
under this subparagraph to be co-chairman of the task
force;

(B) Two (2) members of the Wyoming senate,
appointed by the president of the senate, who serve on the
joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources
interim committee. The president of the senate shall
designate one (1) of the members appointed under this
subparagraph to be co-chairman of the task force.

(ii) Members of the Wyoming state government as
follows:

(A) The director of the state construction
department or the director's designee;

(B) The adjutant general of the Wyoming
military department or the adjutant general's designee.
HB0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0190

(iii) One (1) member representing the interests
of veterans, appointed by the governor.

(b) The task force shall serve in an advisory role
and provide recommendations to the executive branch of
government for the procurement of professional services and
construction and completion of the Wyoming veterans'
memorial museum renovation project. While serving in an
advisory role, the task force shall:

(i) Receive and, when necessary, request
information from the state construction department to stay
informed on all aspects of the Wyoming veterans' memorial
museum renovation project;

(ii) Closely monitor the procurement of
professional services and progress on the Wyoming veterans'
memorial museum renovation project;

(iii) When necessary or prudent, make
recommendations to the state construction department
HB0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0190
regarding important aspects of the Wyoming veterans'
memorial museum renovation project;

(iv) Provide interim reports on the activities
of the task force to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife
and cultural resources interim committee not later than
November 1 of each year that the task force is in
existence.

(c) The task force shall be staffed by the state
construction department with assistance provided by the
department of state parks and cultural resources. In
staffing the task force, the departments shall:

(i) Coordinate and schedule all meetings and
assemble all required meeting agendas and meeting materials
for the task force;

(ii) Act as a liaison between the task force and
the executive branch of state government to communicate
task force recommendations;

HB0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0190
(iii) Provide regular updates and progress
reports to the task force and the state building commission
regarding the Wyoming veterans' memorial museum renovation
project;

(iv) Provide other information and assistance to
the task force as requested.

(d) The legislative members of the task force shall
receive salary, per diem and travel expenses in the manner
and amount prescribed by W.S. 28-5-101. Task force members
representing Wyoming state government shall be considered
to be acting within the scope of regular employment when
conducting the official business of the task force and
shall receive their regular pay without additional
compensation, except that those members shall receive
mileage and per diem as provided for other members of the
task force under this subsection if the members are not
reimbursed by their employer. All other members of the
task force shall not receive salary but shall receive per
diem and mileage in the amount provided for members of the
legislature under W.S. 28-5-101 when conducting the
official business of the task force.
HB0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0190

(e) The task force shall terminate on June 30 of the
year following the year in which the Wyoming veterans'
memorial museum renovation project is completed and the
facility is occupied.

Section 3.

(a) There is appropriated five million dollars
($5,000,000.00) from the Wyoming tourism account to the
state construction department for the Wyoming veterans'
memorial museum renovation project authorized by section 1
of this act. This appropriation is intended to provide a
maximum amount for the project from any source excluding
contingency funding and shall not be construed to be an
entitlement or guaranteed amount. This appropriation shall
be for the period beginning with the effective date of this
act and remaining in effect until the project is completed,
unless otherwise provided. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law upon
HB0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0190
completion of the Wyoming veterans' memorial museum
renovation project.

(b) There is appropriated twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for purposes of providing
payments authorized by section 2 of this act to legislative
members of the Wyoming veterans' memorial museum renovation
task force and for other expenses of the task force
authorized by law or policy of the legislature. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30 of the year
following the year in which the Wyoming veterans' memorial
museum renovation project is completed and the facility is
occupied. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law.

(c) There is appropriated twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) from the general fund to the
governor's office for purposes of providing payments
authorized by section 2 of this act to nonlegislative
HB0175

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0190
members of the Wyoming veterans' memorial museum renovation
task force. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30 of the year following the year in which
construction of the Wyoming veterans' memorial museum
renovation project is complete and the facility is
occupied. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0175